Hawaii statutes.
§469-1 License. The department of
health may, upon payment to it of an examination fee, examine, or cause to be
examined by not less than two practicing embalmers, undertakers, or funeral
directors, any person over eighteen years of age, of good moral character, and
with qualifications specified in one of the following categories:

(1) A minimum of five years practical experience
under the supervision of a registered embalmer or undertaker in the State.

(2) A minimum of two years practical experience under
the supervision of a registered embalmer or undertaker in the State and
completion of a four-year high school course or equivalent educational
training.

(3) Not less than one year of practical experience
and graduation from a recognized school of embalming.

(4) Holder of a state license for embalming.

All examinations shall be conducted in writing
and supplemented by practical demonstrations and shall be upon such subjects as
the department may by rule prescribe. Every person who passes the examination
shall be given a license as an embalmer. [L 1933, c 36, §1; RL 1935, §1450; am
L 1943, c 57, pt of §1; RL 1945, §3051; RL 1955, §72-1; am L 1957, c 316, §8;
am L 1959, c 111, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §469-1; am L 1972, c 2,
§28; am L 1983, c 53, §1]

Cross References

Disposal of examination records, see §94-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next